North Dakota statutes. TITLE 8 Carriage
CHAPTER 8-01 General Provisons

8-01-01.
Contract for carriage defined.

The contract of carriage is a contract for the conveyance of property, persons, or messages from one place to another.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1208; R.C. 1895, § 4174; R.C. 1899, § 4174; R.C. 1905, § 5622; C.L. 1913, § 6185; R.C. 1943, § 8-0101.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2085.

Cross-References.

Damages for breach of carrier’s obligation to accept freight, messages, or passengers, see § 32-03-15.

Venue of offense committed on railroad train or other vehicle, see § 29-03-08.

8-01-02.
Classification.

Carriage is either inland or marine. Carriers upon navigable waters or rivers which are subject to the admiralty jurisdiction of the United States are marine carriers. All others are inland carriers.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1209, 1210; R.C. 1895, §§ 4175, 4176; R.C. 1899, §§ 4175, 4176; R.C. 1905, §§ 5623, 5624; C.L. 1913, §§ 6186, 6187; R.C. 1943, § 8-0102.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1209, 1210.

8-01-03.
Gratuitous carriers — Obligation.

Carriers without reward are subject to the same rules as employees without reward, except so far as is otherwise provided by this title.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1212; R.C. 1895, § 4178; R.C. 1899, § 4178; R.C. 1905, § 5626; C.L. 1913, § 6189; R.C. 1943, § 8-0103.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2089.

8-01-04.
Gratuitous carrier — Obligation where carriage begun.

A carrier without reward, who has begun to perform the carrier’s undertaking, shall complete it in like manner as if the carrier had received a reward, unless the carrier restores the person or thing carried to as favorable a position as before the carrier commenced the carriage.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1213; R.C. 1895, § 4179; R.C. 1899, § 4179; R.C. 1905, § 5627; C.L. 1913, § 6190; R.C. 1943, § 8-0104.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2090.